Utah statutes.
59-1-1005.   Suits against commission and its employees.

(1)  A taxpayer may bring a civil suit against the commission for recovery of actual damages and costs incurred by the taxpayer if:

(a)  the commission or one of its employees intentionally or recklessly takes possession of a taxpayer's property in disregard of its published procedures, laws, or rules; or

(b)  otherwise intentionally or recklessly disregards published procedures, laws, or rules.

(2)  An award of actual damages and court costs in a suit under this section may not exceed $100,000.

(3)  If the court finds that the civil action brought by the taxpayer is frivolous, the court may impose a penalty of up to $10,000 against the taxpayer.

